Nebraska, session 109, LB583.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB583 LB583
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 43-2622, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
43-2622 The Child Care Grant Fund is hereby established to be
administered by the Department of Health and Human Services. The fund
shall consist of money received pursuant to section 76-903 and section
43-2623. The fund shall be used to make grants pursuant to section
43-2624. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested
by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 2. Section 43-2624, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
43-2624 (1) The Department of Health and Human Services shall award
grants to licensed child care providers persons, community-based
organizations, or schools needing assistance to start, maintain, or grow
improve a licensed child care program or needing assistance to provide
for staff training, staff retention or recruitment incentives, or capital
expenses for a licensed child care program located at a child care center
or at-home facility.
(2) No grant shall exceed fifteen ten thousand dollars.
(3) The size of an awarded grant shall be based on need demonstrated
through the application process.
(4) A recipient of a grant shall not be eligible for a grant more
than once in a two-year three-year period.
(5) Child care grants shall be awarded on the basis of need for the
proposed services in the community.
(6) The department shall contract with a statewide organization and
such statewide organization, with guidance from the department, shall:
(a) Prescribe the form on which an eligible recipient may apply to
receive a grant under this section;
(b) Review applications and identify potential grant recipients; and
(c) Provide technical assistance to grant recipients. Grants shall
-2-

LB583 LB583
2025 2025
be given only to grantees who do not discriminate against children with
disabilities or children whose care is funded by any state or federal
funds. When considering grant applications of equal merit, the department
shall award the grant to the applicant which has not previously received
a grant from the Child Care Grant Fund.
Sec. 3. Section 55-901, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
55-901 (1) The Military Installation Development and Support Fund is
created. The fund shall be used to contribute to construction,
development, or support for any military installation, located in
Nebraska, for purposes of improving mission retention and recruitment;
supporting the morale, health, and mental wellness of military members
and families; and growing the economic impact of military installations
in Nebraska. The Department of Veterans' Affairs shall administer the
fund. The fund shall consist of money received pursuant to section
76-903, transfers authorized by the Legislature, and any gifts, grants,
or bequests from any source, including federal, state, public, and
private sources, for such purposes. Any money in the fund available for
investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to
the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds
Investment Act. Beginning October 1, 2024, any investment earnings from
investment of money in the fund shall be credited to the General Fund.
(2) Money transferred to the fund under section 76-903 shall be used
for funding community-based organizations that provide services to
veterans in Nebraska through distributions of:
(a) At least one hundred thousand dollars per year to the Department
of Veterans' Affairs for contracting with community-based organizations
to create a statewide skillbridge strategy or program to attract veterans
to Nebraska; and
(b) At least one hundred thousand dollars per year to community-
based organizations that provide mental health services to veterans in
-3-

LB583 LB583
2025 2025
Nebraska.
(3) (2) The Military Installation Development and Support Fund may
be used for any project that directly supports any military installation
located in Nebraska.
(4) (3) The Department of Veterans' Affairs shall require a match of
public or private funding in an amount equal to or greater than one-half
of the total cost of any project described in subsection (3) (2) of this
section prior to authorizing an expenditure from the fund.
(5) (4) For purposes of this section, military installation means a
base, camp, post, station, yard, center, armory, or other activity under
the jurisdiction of the United States Department of Defense or the
Nebraska Military Department.
Sec. 4. Section 58-703, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
58-703 (1) The Affordable Housing Trust Fund is created. The fund
shall receive money pursuant to section 76-903 and may include revenue
from sources recommended by the housing advisory committee established in
section 58-704, appropriations from the Legislature, transfers authorized
by the Legislature, grants, private contributions, repayment of loans,
and all other sources. The Department of Economic Development as part of
its comprehensive housing affordability strategy shall administer the
Affordable Housing Trust Fund.
(2) From each one dollar and five cents of the money transferred to
the fund under section 76-903:
(a) At least five cents of such money shall be distributed to
emerging developers; and
(b) At least twenty cents of such money shall be distributed to
special population and innovation housing programs.
(3) Transfers may be made from the Affordable Housing Trust Fund to
the General Fund, the Behavioral Health Services Fund, the Lead-Based
Paint Hazard Control Cash Fund, the Middle Income Workforce Housing
-4-

LB583 LB583
2025 2025
Investment Fund, the Rural Workforce Housing Investment Fund, and the
Site and Building Development Fund at the direction of the Legislature.
(4) For purposes of this section:
(a) Emerging developer means any business entity that was not
created more than ten years previous to the distribution under this
section and that specializes in the design, construction, or renovation
of residential properties; and
(b) Special population and innovation housing program means any
program that assists with the provision of accessible housing compliant
with the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, housing for seniors,
reentry housing, or public housing.
Sec. 5. Section 76-901, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
76-901 There is hereby imposed a tax on the grantor executing the
deed as defined in section 76-203 upon the transfer of a beneficial
interest in or legal title to real estate at the rate of three two
dollars and thirty twenty-five cents for each one thousand dollars value
or fraction thereof. For purposes of sections 76-901 to 76-908, value
means (1) in the case of any deed, not a gift, the amount of the full
actual consideration thereof, paid or to be paid, including the amount of
any lien or liens assumed, and (2) in the case of a gift or any deed with
nominal consideration or without stated consideration, the current market
value of the property transferred. Such tax shall be evidenced by stamps
to be attached to the deed. All deeds purporting to transfer legal title
or beneficial interest shall be presumed taxable unless it clearly
appears on the face of the deed or sufficient documentary proof is
presented to the register of deeds that the instrument is exempt under
section 76-902.
Sec. 6. Section 76-903, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
76-903 The Tax Commissioner shall design such stamps in such
-5-

LB583 LB583
2025 2025
denominations as in his or her judgment will be the most advantageous to
all persons concerned. When any deed subject to the tax imposed by
section 76-901 is offered for recordation, the register of deeds shall
ascertain and compute the amount of the tax due thereon and shall collect
such amount as a prerequisite to acceptance of the deed for recordation.
If a dispute arises concerning the taxability of the transfer, the
register of deeds shall not record the deed until the disputed tax is
paid. If a disputed tax has been paid, the taxpayer may file for a refund
pursuant to section 76-908. The taxpayer may also seek a declaratory
ruling pursuant to rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the
Department of Revenue. From each three two dollars and thirty twenty-five
cents of tax collected pursuant to section 76-901, the register of deeds
shall retain seventy-five fifty cents to be placed in the county general
fund and shall remit the balance to the State Treasurer who shall credit:
ninety-five cents of such amount to the Affordable Housing Trust Fund,
twenty-five cents of such amount to the Site and Building Development
Fund, twenty-five cents of such amount to the Homeless Shelter Assistance
Trust Fund, and thirty cents of such amount to the Behavioral Health
Services Fund.
(1) One dollar and five cents of such amount to the Affordable
Housing Trust Fund;
(2) Twenty-five cents of such amount to the Site and Building
Development Fund;
(3) Twenty-five cents of such amount to the Homeless Shelter
Assistance Trust Fund;
(4) Forty cents of such amount to the Behavioral Health Services
Fund;
(5) Five cents of such amount to the Economic Recovery Contingency
Fund for the establishment and operation of an office to pursue and
coordinate grant funding on behalf of the state;
(6) Five cents of such amount to the Military Installation
-6-

LB583 LB583
2025 2025
Development and Support Fund to support community-based organizations
that provide services to veterans in Nebraska through distributions
described in subsection (2) of section 55-901;
(7) Five cents of such amount to the Innovation Hub Cash Fund for
operational support of innovation hubs;
(8) Five cents of such amount to the Health Care Homes for the
Medically Underserved Fund; and
(9) Forty cents of such amount to the Child Care Grant Fund.
Sec. 7. Section 77-1327, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
77-1327 (1) It is the intent of the Legislature that accurate and
comprehensive information be developed by the Property Tax Administrator
and made accessible to the taxing officials and property owners in order
to ensure the uniformity and proportionality of the assessments of real
property valuations in the state in accordance with law and to provide
the statistical and narrative reports pursuant to section 77-5027.
(2) All transactions of real property for which the statement
required in section 76-214 is filed shall be available for development of
a sales file by the Property Tax Administrator. All transactions with
stated consideration of more than one hundred dollars or upon which more
than three two dollars and thirty twenty-five cents in documentary stamp
taxes are paid shall be considered sales. All sales shall be deemed to be
arm's length transactions unless determined to be otherwise under
professionally accepted mass appraisal techniques. The Department of
Revenue shall not overturn a determination made by a county assessor
regarding the qualification of a sale unless the department reviews the
sale and determines through the review that the determination made by the
county assessor is incorrect.
(3) The Property Tax Administrator annually shall make and issue
comprehensive assessment ratio studies of the average level of
assessment, the degree of assessment uniformity, and the overall
-7-

LB583 LB583
2025 2025
compliance with assessment requirements for each major class of real
property subject to the property tax in each county. The comprehensive
assessment ratio studies shall be developed in compliance with
professionally accepted mass appraisal techniques and shall employ such
statistical analysis as deemed appropriate by the Property Tax
Administrator, including measures of central tendency and dispersion. The
comprehensive assessment ratio studies shall be based upon the sales file
as developed in subsection (2) of this section and shall be used by the
Property Tax Administrator for the analysis of the level of value and
quality of assessment for purposes of section 77-5027 and by the Property
Tax Administrator in establishing the adjusted valuations required by
section 79-1016. Such studies may also be used by assessing officials in
establishing assessed valuations.
(4) For purposes of determining the level of value of agricultural
and horticultural land subject to special valuation under sections
77-1343 to 77-1347.01, the Property Tax Administrator shall annually make
and issue a comprehensive study developed in compliance with
professionally accepted mass appraisal techniques to establish the level
of value if in his or her opinion the level of value cannot be developed
through the use of the comprehensive assessment ratio studies developed
in subsection (3) of this section.
(5) County assessors and other taxing officials shall electronically
report data on the assessed valuation and other features of the property
assessment process for such periods and in such form and content as the
Property Tax Administrator shall deem appropriate. The Property Tax
Administrator shall so construct and maintain the system used to collect
and analyze the data to enable him or her to make intracounty comparisons
of assessed valuation, including school districts and other political
subdivisions, as well as intercounty comparisons of assessed valuation,
including school districts and other political subdivisions. The Property
Tax Administrator shall include analysis of real property sales pursuant
-8-

LB583 LB583
2025 2025
to land contracts and similar transfers at the time of execution of the
contract or similar transfer.
Sec. 8. Section 81-12,114, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-12,114 (1) The Innovation Hub Cash Fund is created. The fund
shall be administered by the department and shall consist of money
received pursuant to section 76-903, application fees received under
section 81-12,110, funds transferred by the Legislature, and any other
money as determined by the Legislature.
(2) The fund shall be used by the department for purposes of
carrying out the Nebraska Innovation Hub Act. Money transferred to the
fund under section 76-903 shall be used for the operational support of
innovation hubs. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be
invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 9. Section 81-12,243, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-12,243 (1) The Economic Recovery Contingency Fund is created. The
fund shall consist of money received pursuant to section 76-903 and
transfers by the Legislature to carry out the Economic Recovery Act.
Transfers may be made from the Economic Recovery Contingency Fund to the
Museum Construction and Maintenance Fund at the direction of the
Legislature. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be
invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Investment
earnings on and after July 1, 2023, shall be credited to the fund.
(2) Money transferred to the fund under section 76-903 shall be used
for the establishment and operation of an office to pursue and coordinate
grant funding on behalf of the state.
(3) (2) The Department of Economic Development may review the
projects listed in the coordination plan and the appendices by the
-9-

LB583 LB583
2025 2025
Economic Recovery Special Committee of the Legislature dated January 10,
2023, and shall prioritize the use of the fund on projects listed in the
coordination plan followed by the projects in the appendices.
(4) (3) The State Treasurer shall transfer seven hundred fifty
thousand dollars from the Economic Recovery Contingency Fund to the
Museum Construction and Maintenance Fund on or after July 1, 2024, but
before December 31, 2024, on such dates and in such amounts as directed
by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of
Administrative Services. The State Treasurer shall transfer fifteen
million dollars from the Economic Recovery Contingency Fund to the Museum
Construction and Maintenance Fund on or after July 1, 2025, but before
December 31, 2025, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the
budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of
Administrative Services.
(5) (4) The State Treasurer shall transfer thirty million dollars
from the Economic Recovery Contingency Fund to the Inland Port Authority
Fund no later than five business days after April 17, 2024, for the
purpose of creating and operating an innovation district by an inland
port authority and for any other purpose authorized under the Municipal
Inland Port Authority Act.
(6) (5) The State Treasurer shall transfer any unobligated funds
remaining in the Economic Recovery Contingency Fund on July 31, 2026, to
the Inland Port Authority Fund.
(7) (6) The State Treasurer shall transfer seven million dollars
from the Economic Recovery Contingency Fund to the Museum Construction
and Maintenance Fund on or after January 1, 2026, but before June 30,
2026, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget
administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
Sec. 10. Section 81-3140, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
-10-

LB583 LB583
2025 2025
81-3140 (1)(a) The purpose of the Health Care Homes for the
Medically Underserved Fund is to enhance the ability of Nebraska's
federally qualified health centers to provide patient-centered medical
homes to low-income medically underserved populations. Twenty-five
percent of the state portion of medicaid fraud settlement funds deposited
into the Medicaid Fraud Settlement Fund in the Department of Health and
Human Services annually shall be transferred to the Health Care Homes for
the Medically Underserved Fund for distribution to federally qualified
health centers in Nebraska. The Health Care Homes for the Medically
Underserved Fund shall also receive money pursuant to section 76-903.
Such funds and money shall be distributed proportionately based on the
unduplicated number of patients served in the previous year by such
federally qualified health centers as reported through the uniform data
system of the Health Resources and Services Administration of the United
States Department of Health and Human Services.
(b) Five percent of the state portion of the medicaid fraud
settlement funds deposited into the Medicaid Fraud Settlement Fund in the
Department of Health and Human Services annually shall be transferred to
the Health Care Homes for the Medically Underserved Fund for distribution
to federally qualified health centers in Nebraska. Such funds shall be
used for persons receiving services under section 330(h) or 330(i) of the
federal Public Health Service Act, 42 U.S.C. 254b, as such section
existed on January 1, 2016.
(2) Funds distributed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section
shall be used for the following purposes:
(a) Hiring, training, certifying, and maintaining staff dedicated to
patient-centered chronic disease management, including, but not limited
to, case managers, health educators, social workers, outreach and
enrollment workers, and community health workers;
(b) Providing services, including, but not limited to, interpreter
services, transportation services, and social work assistance;
-11-

LB583 LB583
2025 2025
(c) Capital improvements, including, but not limited to, facility
expansion, leasing additional space, and furnishing, equipment, or
redesign of facilities to support patient-centered care;
(d) Medication management, including, but not limited to, clinical
pharmacy services, pharmacists, clinical pharmacists, technology for
monitoring and real-time notification, and care managers;
(e) Information technology, including, but not limited to,
telehealth services, analytics tools, patient registries, and updates to
electronic health records systems; and
(f) Reimbursement to health care providers, including, but not
limited to, physicians, nurse practitioners, dieticians, diabetic
educators, behavioral health providers, and oral health providers.
Sec. 11. This act becomes operative on October 1, 2025.
Sec. 12. Original sections 43-2622, 43-2624, 76-901, 76-903,
77-1327, 81-12,114, 81-12,243, and 81-3140, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, and sections 55-901 and 58-703, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-12-